Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [515B.5-101] LOCAL GOVERNMENT REGULATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "local government" means a county; a municipality as defined in section 462.352, subdivision 2; a joint planning board; or a public corporation, including the Metropolitan Council. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited regulations. new text end new text begin Except as required by state or federal law or rule, a local government must not condition approval of a residential building permit or conditional use permit, residential subdivision development or residential planned unit development, or any other permit related to residential development on the: new text end new text begin (1) creation of a homeowners association; new text end new text begin (2) inclusion of any service, feature, or common property necessitating a homeowners association, unless requested by the developer; new text end new text begin (3) inclusion of any terms in a homeowners association declaration, bylaws, articles of incorporation, or any other governing document; or new text end new text begin (4) adoption or revocation of, or amendment to, a rule or regulation governing the homeowners association or its members. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section prohibits: new text end new text begin (1) a local government from requiring the maintenance or insurance of common elements; or new text end new text begin (2) a project applicant from providing an easement to access public infrastructure. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end